California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 403, Sec. 1.   (AB 2496)   Effective September 22, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1062.34.)
-------------------------------------------

1062.32.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “FFA” means a foster family agency or a noncustodial adoption agency, as these terms are defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Public entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 811.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 403, Sec. 1.   (AB 2496)   Effective September 22, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1062.34.)
-------------------------------------------

1062.33.

(a) An FFA may be held liable for injury or damage caused by the negligence of the FFA but not for the injury or damage caused by the public entity, including its officers, employees, or volunteers, acting in its capacity. The FFA and the public entity shall each bear the cost of insuring against their respective acts and omissions and shall each bear the costs of defending itself against claims arising from those risks.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, subdivision (a) shall
 not be waived or suspended by any court. Any provision in a nongovernmental organization contract for child, youth, and family services in which a public entity is indemnified, held harmless, or insured for damages, claims, losses, or expenses arising from injury or damage, including, but not limited to, bodily injury, mental anguish, property damage, or economic or noneconomic damages or loss, caused by or resulting from a public entity’s negligence or intentional conduct, in whole or in part, shall be void as against public policy and unenforceable.

(2) Subdivision (a) does not limit or affect the immunity provided by any other law that would otherwise be an available defense to either party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 403, Sec. 1.   (AB 2496)   Effective September 22, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1062.34.)
-------------------------------------------

1062.34.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 403, Sec. 1.   (AB 2496)   Effective September 22, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 11, commencing with Section 1062.30.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

PART 3. OF SPECIAL PROCEEDINGS OF A CIVIL NATURE [1063. - 1822.60.]



PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS

1063.

The party prosecuting a special proceeding may be known as the plaintiff, and the adverse party as the defendant.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.

A judgment in a special proceeding is the final determination of the rights of the parties therein. The definitions of a motion and an order in a civil action are applicable to similar acts in a special proceeding.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 1. OF WRITS OF REVIEW, MANDATE, AND PROHIBITION [[1067.] - 1110b.]



  CHAPTER 1. Writ of Review [[1067.] - 1077.]

[1067.]

Section Ten Hundred and Sixty-seven. The writ of certiorari may be denominated the writ of review.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 383.)
-------------------------------------------

1068.

(a) A writ of review may be granted by any court when an inferior tribunal, board, or officer, exercising judicial functions, has exceeded the jurisdiction of such tribunal, board, or officer, and there is no appeal, nor, in the judgment of the court, any plain, speedy, and adequate remedy.

(b) The appellate division of the superior court may grant a writ of review directed to the superior court in a limited civil case or in a misdemeanor or infraction case. Where the
 appellate division grants a writ of review directed to the superior court, the superior court is an inferior tribunal for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1069.

The application must be made on the verified petition of the party beneficially interested, and the court may require a notice of the application to be given to the adverse party, or may grant an order to show cause why it should not be allowed, or may grant the writ without notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1907, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

1069.1.

The provisions of Section 1089 as to a return by demurrer or answer apply to a proceeding pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1475.)
-------------------------------------------

1070.

The writ may be directed to the inferior tribunal, Board, or officer, or to any other person having the custody of the record or proceedings to be certified. When directed to a tribunal, the Clerk, if there be one, must return the writ with the transcript required.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1071.

The writ of review must command the party to whom it is directed to certify fully to the court issuing the writ at a time and place then or thereafter specified by court order a transcript of the record and proceedings (describing or referring to them with convenient certainty), that the same may be reviewed by the court; and requiring the party, in the meantime, to desist from further proceedings in the matter to be reviewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1072.

If a stay of proceedings be not intended, the words requiring the stay must be omitted from the writ; these words may be inserted or omitted, in the sound discretion of the Court, but if omitted, the power of the inferior Court or officer is not suspended or the proceedings stayed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1073.

The writ must be served in the same manner as a summons in civil action, except when otherwise expressly directed by the Court.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1074.

The review upon this writ cannot be extended further than to determine whether the inferior tribunal, Board, or officer has regularly pursued the authority of such tribunal, Board, or officer.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1075.

If the return of the writ be defective, the Court may order a further return to be made. When a full return has been made, the Court must hear the parties, or such of them as may attend for that purpose, and may thereupon give judgment, either affirming or annulling, or modifying the proceedings below.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1076.

A copy of the judgment, signed by the Clerk, must be transmitted to the inferior tribunal, Board, or officer having the custody of the record or proceeding certified up.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.

A copy of the judgment, signed by the Clerk, entered upon or attached to the writ and return, constitute the judgment roll.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Writ of Mandate [[1084.] - [1097.]]

[1084.]

The writ of mandamus may be denominated a writ of mandate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 39.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1085.

(a) A writ of mandate may be issued by any court to any inferior tribunal, corporation, board, or person, to compel the performance of an act which the law specially enjoins, as a duty resulting from an office, trust, or station, or to compel the admission of a party to the use and enjoyment of a right or office to which the party is entitled, and from which the party is unlawfully precluded by that
 inferior tribunal, corporation, board, or person.

(b) The appellate division of the superior court may grant a writ of mandate directed to the superior court in a limited civil case or in a misdemeanor or infraction case. Where the appellate division grants a writ of mandate directed to the superior court, the superior court is an inferior tribunal for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 212, Sec. 2.   (AB 2767)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1085.5.

Notwithstanding this chapter, in any action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the activity of the Director of Food and Agriculture under Division 4 (commencing with Section 5001) or Division 5 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Food and Agricultural Code, the procedure for issuance of a writ of mandate shall be in accordance with Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 5051) of Part 1 of Division 4 of that code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1284, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1086.

The writ must be issued in all cases where there is not a plain, speedy, and adequate remedy, in the ordinary course of law. It must be issued upon the verified petition of the party beneficially interested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1907, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

1087.

The writ may be either alternative or peremptory. The alternative writ must command the party to whom it is directed immediately after the receipt of the writ, or at some other specified time, to do the act required to be performed, or to show cause before the court at a time and place then or thereafter specified by court order why he has not done so. The peremptory writ must be in a similar form, except that the words requiring the party to show cause why he has not done as commanded must be omitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1088.

When the application to the court is made without notice to the adverse party, and the writ is allowed, the alternative must be first issued; but if the application is upon due notice and the writ is allowed, the peremptory may be issued in the first instance. With the alternative writ and also with any notice of an intention to apply for the writ, there must be served on each person against whom the writ is sought a copy of the petition. The notice of the application, when given, must be at least ten days. The writ cannot be granted by default. The case must be heard by the court, whether the adverse party appears or not.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1907, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

1088.5.

In a trial court, if no alternative writ is sought, proof of service of a copy of the petition need not accompany the application for a writ at the time of filing, but proof of service of a copy of the filed petition must be lodged with the court prior to a hearing or any action by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 818, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1089.

On the date for return of the alternative writ, or on which the application for the writ is noticed, or, if the Judicial Council shall adopt rules relating to the return and answer, then at the time provided by those rules, the party upon whom the writ or notice has been served may make a return by demurrer, verified answer or both. If the return is by demurrer alone, the court may allow an answer to be filed within such time as it may designate. Nothing in this section affects rules of the Judicial Council governing original writ proceedings in reviewing courts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1475.)
-------------------------------------------

1089.5.

Where a petition for writ of mandate is filed in the trial court pursuant to Section 1088.5, and where a record of the proceedings to be reviewed has been filed with the petition or where no record of a proceeding is required, the respondent shall answer or otherwise respond within 30 days after service of the petition. However, where a record of the proceeding to be reviewed has been requested pursuant to Section 11523 of the Government Code, or otherwise, and has not been filed with the petition, the party upon whom the petition has been served, including any real party in interest, shall answer or otherwise respond within 30 days following receipt
 of a copy of the record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 818, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1090.

If a return be made, which raises a question as to a matter of fact essential to the determination of the motion, and affecting the substantial rights of the parties, and upon the supposed truth of the allegation of which the application for the writ is based, the court may, in its discretion, order the question to be tried before a jury, and postpone the argument until such trial can be had, and the verdict certified to the court. The question to be tried must be distinctly stated in the order for trial, and the county must be designated in which the same shall be had. The order may also direct the jury to assess any damages which the applicant may have sustained, in case
 they find for him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1475.)
-------------------------------------------

1091.

On the trial, the applicant is not precluded by the return from any valid objection to its sufficiency, and may countervail it by proof either in direct denial or by way of avoidance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1475.)
-------------------------------------------

1092.

The motion for new trial must be made in the Court in which the issue of fact is tried.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1093.

If no notice of a motion for a new trial be given, or if given, the motion be denied, the Clerk, within five days after rendition of the verdict or denial of the motion, must transmit to the Court in which the application for the writ is pending, a certified copy of the verdict attached to the order of trial; after which either party may bring on the argument of the application, upon reasonable notice to the adverse party.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1094.

If no return be made, the case may be heard on the papers of the applicant. If the return raises only questions of law, or puts in issue immaterial statements, not affecting the substantial rights of the parties, the court must proceed to hear or fix a day for hearing the argument of the case.

If a petition for a writ of mandate filed pursuant to Section 1088.5 presents no triable issue of fact or is based solely on an administrative record, the matter may be determined by the court by noticed motion of any party for a judgment on the peremptory writ.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 193, Sec. 3.   Effective May 5, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1094.5.

(a) Where the writ is issued for the purpose of inquiring into the validity of any final administrative order or decision made as the result of a proceeding in which by law a hearing is required to be given, evidence is required to be taken, and discretion in the determination of facts is vested in the inferior tribunal, corporation, board, or officer, the case shall be heard by the court sitting
 without a jury. All or part of the record of the proceedings before the inferior tribunal, corporation, board, or officer may be filed with the petition, may be filed with respondent’s points and authorities, or may be ordered to be filed by the court. Except when otherwise prescribed by statute, the cost of preparing the record shall be borne by the petitioner. Where the petitioner has proceeded pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 68630) of Chapter 2 of Title 8 of the Government Code and the Rules of Court implementing that section and where the transcript is necessary to a proper review of the administrative proceedings, the cost of preparing the transcript shall be borne by the respondent. Where the party seeking the writ has proceeded pursuant to Section 1088.5, the administrative record shall be filed as expeditiously as possible, and may be filed with the petition, or by the respondent after payment of the costs by the petitioner, where required, or as otherwise directed by the court. If the
 expense of preparing all or any part of the record has been borne by the prevailing party, the expense shall be taxable as costs.

(b) The inquiry in such a case shall extend to the questions whether the respondent has proceeded without, or in excess of, jurisdiction; whether there was a fair trial; and whether there was any prejudicial abuse of discretion. Abuse of discretion is established if the respondent has not proceeded in the manner required by law, the order or decision is not supported by the findings, or the findings are not supported by the evidence.

(c) Where it is claimed that the findings are not supported by the evidence, in cases in which the court is authorized by law to exercise its independent judgment on the evidence, abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that the findings are not supported by the weight of the evidence. In all other cases,
 abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that the findings are not supported by substantial evidence in the light of the whole record.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), in cases arising from private hospital boards or boards of directors of districts organized pursuant to the Local Health Care District Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 32000) of Division 23 of the Health and Safety Code) or governing bodies of municipal hospitals formed pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 37600) or Article 8 (commencing with Section 37650) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 4 of the Government Code, abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that the findings are not supported by substantial evidence in the light of the whole record. However, in all cases in which the petition alleges discriminatory actions prohibited by Section 1316 of the Health and Safety Code, and the plaintiff makes a
 preliminary showing of substantial evidence in support of that allegation, the court shall exercise its independent judgment on the evidence and abuse of discretion shall be established if the court determines that the findings are not supported by the weight of the evidence.

(e) Where the court finds that there is relevant evidence that, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, could not have been produced or that was improperly excluded at the hearing before respondent, it may enter judgment as provided in subdivision (f) remanding the case to be reconsidered in the light of that evidence; or, in cases in which the court is authorized by law to exercise its independent judgment on the evidence, the court may admit the evidence at the hearing on the writ without remanding the case.

(f) The court shall enter judgment either commanding respondent to set aside the order or decision,
 or denying the writ. Where the judgment commands that the order or decision be set aside, it may order the reconsideration of the case in light of the court’s opinion and judgment and may order respondent to take such further action as is specially enjoined upon it by law, but the judgment shall not limit or control in any way the discretion legally vested in the respondent.

(g) Except as provided in subdivision (h), the court in which proceedings under this section are instituted may stay the operation of the administrative order or decision pending the judgment of the court, or until the filing of a notice of appeal from the judgment or until the expiration of the time for filing the notice, whichever occurs first. However, no such stay shall be imposed or continued if the court is satisfied that it is against the public interest. The application for the stay shall be accompanied by proof of service of a copy of the application on the
 respondent. Service shall be made in the manner provided by Title 4.5 (commencing with Section 405) of Part 2 or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1010) of Title 14 of Part 2. If an appeal is taken from a denial of the writ, the order or decision of the agency shall not be stayed except upon the order of the court to which the appeal is taken. However, in cases where a stay is in effect at the time of filing the notice of appeal, the stay shall be continued by operation of law for a period of 20 days from the filing of the notice. If an appeal is taken from the granting of the writ, the order or decision of the agency is stayed pending the determination of the appeal unless the court to which the appeal is taken shall otherwise order. Where any final administrative order or decision is the subject of proceedings under this section, if the petition shall have been filed while the penalty imposed is in full force and effect, the determination shall not be considered to have become moot in cases where the
 penalty imposed by the administrative agency has been completed or complied with during the pendency of the proceedings.

(h) (1) The court in which proceedings under this section are instituted may stay the operation of the administrative order or decision of any licensed hospital or any state agency made after a hearing required by statute to be conducted under the Administrative Procedure Act, as set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, conducted by the agency itself or an administrative law judge on the staff of the Office of Administrative Hearings pending the judgment of the court, or until the filing of a notice of appeal from the judgment or until the expiration of the time for filing the notice, whichever occurs first. However, the stay shall not be imposed or continued unless the court is satisfied that the public interest will not suffer and
 that the licensed hospital or agency is unlikely to prevail ultimately on the merits. The application for the stay shall be accompanied by proof of service of a copy of the application on the respondent. Service shall be made in the manner provided by Title 4.5 (commencing with Section 405) of Part 2 or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1010) of Title 14 of Part 2.

(2) The standard set forth in this subdivision for obtaining a stay shall apply to any administrative order or decision of an agency that issues licenses pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code or pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act or the Chiropractic Initiative Act. With respect to orders or decisions of other state agencies, the standard in this subdivision shall apply only when the agency has adopted the proposed decision of the administrative law judge in its entirety or has adopted the proposed decision but reduced the
 proposed penalty pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11517 of the Government Code; otherwise the standard in subdivision (g) shall apply.

(3) If an appeal is taken from a denial of the writ, the order or decision of the hospital or agency shall not be stayed except upon the order of the court to which the appeal is taken. However, in cases where a stay is in effect at the time of filing the notice of appeal, the stay shall be continued by operation of law for a period of 20 days from the filing of the notice. If an appeal is taken from the granting of the writ, the order or decision of the hospital or agency is stayed pending the determination of the appeal unless the court to which the appeal is taken shall otherwise order. Where any final administrative order or decision is the subject of proceedings under this section, if the petition shall have been filed while the penalty imposed is in full force and effect, the determination shall not
 be considered to have become moot in cases where the penalty imposed by the administrative agency has been completed or complied with during the pendency of the proceedings.

(i) Any administrative record received for filing by the clerk of the court may be disposed of as provided in Sections 1952, 1952.2, and 1952.3.

(j) Effective January 1, 1996, this subdivision shall apply to state employees in State Bargaining Unit 5. For purposes of this section, the court is not authorized to review any disciplinary decisions reached pursuant to Section 19576.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 41.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1094.6.

(a) Judicial review of any decision of a local agency, other than school district, as the term local agency is defined in Section 54951 of the Government Code, or of any commission, board, officer or agent thereof, may be had pursuant to Section 1094.5 of this code only if the petition for writ of mandate pursuant to such section is filed within the time limits specified in this section.

(b) Any such petition shall be filed not later than the 90th day following the date on
 which the decision becomes final. If there is no provision for reconsideration of the decision, or for a written decision or written findings supporting the decision, in any applicable provision of any statute, charter, or rule, for the purposes of this section, the decision is final on the date it is announced. If the decision is not announced at the close of the hearing, the date, time, and place of the announcement of the decision shall be announced at the hearing. If there is a provision for reconsideration, the decision is final for purposes of this section upon the expiration of the period during which such reconsideration can be sought; provided, that if reconsideration is sought pursuant to any such provision the decision is final for the purposes of this section on the date that reconsideration is rejected. If there is a provision for a written decision or written findings, the decision is final for purposes of this section upon the date it is mailed by first-class mail, postage prepaid, including a
 copy of the affidavit or certificate of mailing, to the party seeking the writ. Subdivision (a) of Section 1013 does not apply to extend the time, following deposit in the mail of the decision or findings, within which a petition shall be filed. 

(c) The complete record of the proceedings shall be prepared by the local agency or its commission, board, officer, or agent which made the decision and shall be delivered to the petitioner within 190 days after he has filed a written request therefor. The local agency may recover from the petitioner its actual costs for transcribing or otherwise preparing the record. Such record shall include the transcript of the proceedings, all pleadings, all notices and orders, any proposed decision by a hearing officer, the final decision, all admitted exhibits, all rejected exhibits in the possession of the local agency or its commission, board, officer, or agent, all written evidence, and any other papers in
 the case.

(d) If the petitioner files a request for the record as specified in subdivision (c) within 10 days after the date the decision becomes final as provided in subdivision (b), the time within which a petition pursuant to Section 1094.5 may be filed shall be extended to not later than the 30th day following the date on which the record is either personally delivered or mailed to the petitioner or his attorney of record, if he has one. 

(e) As used in this section, decision means a decision subject to review pursuant to Section 1094.5, suspending, demoting, or dismissing an officer or employee, revoking, denying an application for a permit, license, or other entitlement, imposing a civil or administrative penalty, fine, charge, or cost, or denying an application for any retirement benefit or allowance.

(f) In
 making a final decision as defined in subdivision (e), the local agency shall provide notice to the party that the time within which judicial review must be sought is governed by this section. 

As used in this subdivision, “party” means an officer or employee who has been suspended, demoted or dismissed; a person whose permit, license, or other entitlement has been revoked or suspended, or whose application for a permit, license, or other entitlement has been denied; or a person whose application for a retirement benefit or allowance has been denied. 

(g) This section shall prevail over any conflicting provision in any otherwise applicable law relating to the subject matter, unless the conflicting provision is a state or federal law which provides a shorter statute of limitations, in which case the shorter statute of limitations shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 898, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1094.8.

(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, an action or proceeding to review the issuance, revocation, suspension, or denial of a permit or other entitlement for expressive conduct protected by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution shall be conducted in accordance with subdivision (d).

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) The terms
 “permit” and “entitlement” are used interchangeably.

(2) The term “permit applicant” means both an applicant for a permit and a permitholder.

(3) The term “public agency” means a city, county, city and county, a joint powers authority or similar public entity formed pursuant to Section 65850.4 of the Government Code, or any other public entity authorized by law to issue permits for expressive conduct protected by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution.

(c) A public agency may, if it so chooses, designate the permits or entitlements to which this section applies by adopting an ordinance or resolution which contains a specific listing or other description of the permits or entitlements issued by the public agency which are eligible for expedited judicial review pursuant to this section because the
 permits regulate expressive conduct protected by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution.

(d) The procedure set forth in this subdivision, when applicable, shall supersede anything to the contrary set forth in this chapter.

(1) Within five court days after receipt of written notification from a permit applicant that the permit applicant will seek judicial review of a public agency’s action on the permit, the public agency shall prepare, certify, and make available the administrative record to the permit applicant.

(2) Either the public agency or the permit applicant may bring an action in accordance with the procedure set forth in this section. If the permit applicant brings the action, the action shall be in the form of a petition for writ of mandate pursuant to Section 1085 or 1094.5, as
 appropriate.

(3) The party bringing the action pursuant to this section shall file and serve the petition on the respondent no later than 21 calendar days following the public agency’s final decision on the permit. The title page of the petition shall contain the following language in 18-point type:

“ATTENTION: THIS MATTER IS ENTITLED TO PRIORITY AND SUBJECT TO THE EXPEDITED HEARING AND REVIEW PROCEDURES CONTAINED IN SECTION 1094.8 OF THE CODE OF CIVIL PROCEDURE.”

(4) The clerk of the court shall set a hearing for review of the petition no later than 25 calendar days from the date the petition is filed. Moving, opposition, and reply papers shall be filed as provided in the California Rules of Court. The petitioner shall lodge the administrative record with the court no later than 10 calendar days in advance of the hearing date.

(5) Following the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall render its decision in an expeditious manner consistent with constitutional requirements in view of the particular facts and circumstances. In no event shall the decision be rendered later than 20 calendar days after the matter is submitted or 50 calendar days after the date the petition is filed pursuant to paragraph (4), whichever is earlier.

(e) If the presiding judge of the court in which the action is filed determines that, as a result of either the press of other court business or other factors, the court will be unable to meet any one or more of the deadlines provided within this section, the presiding judge shall request the temporary assignment of a judicial officer to hear the petition and render a decision within the time limits contained herein, pursuant to Section 68543.8 of the Government Code. Given the short
 time period involved, the request shall be entitled to priority.

(f) In any action challenging the issuance, revocation, suspension, or denial of a permit or entitlement, the parties to the action shall be permitted to jointly waive the time limits provided for herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Effective June 28, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1094.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an action or proceeding to review the denial of a permit or other entitlement for a housing development project or residential dwelling unit shall be conducted pursuant to subdivision (d), if the petitioner timely provides the notice described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d).

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Applicant” means a party that has submitted an application or requested a permit for a housing development project.

(2) “Department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(3) “Disapproves the housing development project” has the same meaning as described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code.

(4) “Housing development project” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code. It includes housing development projects consisting of one residential unit.

(5) “Local agency” means a city, county, city and county, district, or other local authority.

(c) Actions brought pursuant to this section, including when on appeal from the decision of a lower court, shall be given preference over all other civil actions before the court when setting the matter for hearing or trial and holding the hearing or trial.

(d) The procedure set forth in this subdivision, supersedes anything to the contrary set forth in this chapter.

(1) An
 applicant, the Attorney General, or the department may bring any action under this section. The action shall be in the form of a petition for writ of mandate pursuant to Section 1085 or 1094.5, or both, as appropriate.

(2) Upon request of the applicant, or notice from the department or the Attorney General, the local agency shall prepare the record of its proceedings concurrently with the local agency’s proceedings.

(A) This record of proceedings shall include, at a minimum, the local agency’s decision, filings, notices, orders, transcripts of the local agency’s administrative proceedings pertaining to the housing development project, staff reports, and documents relied upon
 by the local agency in denying a permit or entitlement of the housing development project or residential dwelling unit.

(B) The parties
 shall meet and confer to certify the record of proceedings no later than 15 days after a petition for writ of mandate is served. Any disputed items shall be subject to a separate motion to be specially noticed on or before the date of the hearing on the writ petition, and in accordance with any local court rules.

(C) The cost of preparation of the administrative record shall be borne by the local agency, unless the petitioner elects to prepare the record.

(3) The record of the proceedings before the local agency shall be lodged with the court as expeditiously as possible. All or part of the
 record may be filed:

(A) By the petitioner with the petition or petitioner’s points and authorities.

(B) By the respondent with respondent’s points and authorities.

(C) After payment of costs by the petitioner, or:

(D) As otherwise directed by the court.

If the expense of preparing the record has been borne by the petitioner and the petitioner is the prevailing party, the expense shall be taxable as costs.

(4) A
 petitioner who elects to bring an action pursuant to this section shall file and serve the petition on the respondent no later than 90 days from the later of (1) the effective date of a decision of the local agency imposing conditions on, disapproving, or any other final action on a housing development project, (2) the effective date of the denial of a permit for a housing development project, or (3) any other action by which respondent disapproves the housing development project. The title page of the petition shall contain the following language in 18-point type:

“ATTENTION: THIS MATTER IS ENTITLED TO PRIORITY AND SUBJECT TO THE EXPEDITED HEARING AND REVIEW PROCEDURES CONTAINED IN SECTION 1094.9 OF THE CODE OF CIVIL PROCEDURE.” 

(5) The clerk of the court shall set a
 hearing for review of the petition for writ of mandate no later than 45 calendar days from the date the petition is filed. Moving, opposition, and reply papers shall be filed as provided in the California Rules of Court. If not otherwise filed, the petitioner shall lodge the record of proceedings with the court no later than 15 calendar days before of the hearing date.

(6) Following the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall render its decision in an expeditious manner. In no event shall the decision be rendered later than 30 calendar days after the matter is submitted or 75 calendar days after the date the petition is filed pursuant to paragraph (4), whichever is earlier.

(e) If the presiding judge of the court in which the action is filed determines that, as a result of
 either the press of other court business or other factors, the court will be unable to meet any of the deadlines provided within this section, the presiding judge may request the temporary assignment of a judicial officer to hear the petition and render a decision within the time limits contained herein, pursuant to California Rules of Court Rule 2.812 and Section 68543.8 of the Government Code. Given the short time period involved, the request shall be entitled to priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 527, Sec. 2.   (SB 808)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1095.

If judgment be given for the applicant, the applicant may recover the damages which the applicant has sustained, as found by the jury, or as may be determined by the court or referee, upon a reference to be ordered, together with costs; and a peremptory mandate must also be awarded without delay. Damages and costs may be enforced in the manner provided for money judgments generally. In all cases where the respondent is an officer of a public entity, all damages and costs, or either, which may be recovered or awarded, shall be recovered and awarded against the public entity represented by the officer, and not against the officer so appearing in the
 proceeding, and are a proper claim against the public entity for which the officer appeared and shall be paid as other claims against the public entity are paid; but in all such cases, the court shall first determine that the officer appeared and made defense in the proceeding in good faith. For the purpose of this section, “public entity” includes the state, a county, city, district or other public agency or public corporation. For the purpose of this section, “officer” includes officer, agent or employee.
